Nevada, session 83, SB496.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Department of Motor Vehicles for the costs of
migrating a legacy information system to a cloud platform the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $13,780,212
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $9,792,437
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year and may be transferred from one fiscal year to the
other with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor. Any remaining balance of those
sums must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by
the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to which
money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the appropriated money remaining
must not be spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Department of Motor Vehicles for the costs of
the continuation of the modernization project for the information
system of the Department the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $33,903,370
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $39,687,596
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year and may be transferred from one fiscal year to the
other with the approval of the Interim Finance Committee upon the
recommendation of the Governor. Any remaining balance of those
sums must not be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by
the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to which
money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the appropriated money remaining
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
must not be spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)